Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060a of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Cooling system” means a cooling cap, hypothermia cap, cold


cap, physical cooling treatment, or any other therapeutic device


used to cool the scalp, hands, or feet of an individual to prevent


or reduce side effects of chemotherapy including, but not limited


to, hair loss, polyneuropathy, or palmar-plantar erythrodysesthesia;


and


2. “Health benefit plan” means the same as defined in Section


6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 2501 Page 1


B. All health benefit plans shall provide coverage cooling


systems used in connection with chemotherapy treatment.


C. Coverage under this section shall not be subject to any


annual deductibles, co-payments, or coinsurance limits as


established for all covered benefits under the health benefit plan.


D. If application of this section would result in health


savings account ineligibility under Section 223 of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the provisions of this section


shall only apply to health savings accounts with qualified high


deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of such a


plan after the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible.


Provided, however, the provisions of this section shall apply to


items or services that are preventive care pursuant to Section


223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


regardless of whether the minimum deductible has been satisfied.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2501 CAD 1/14/2026 8:54:28 AM







Req. No. 2501 Page 2